Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7002
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Revenue;

(2) E-15 means ethanol blended gasoline formulated with a percentage of more than ten percent but no more than fifteen percent by volume of ethanol;

(3) E-25 means ethanol blended gasoline formulated with a percentage of twenty-five percent by volume of ethanol;

(4) E-30 means ethanol blended gasoline formulated with a percentage of thirty percent by volume of ethanol;

(5) E-85 means ethanol blended gasoline formulated with a percentage of fifty-one percent to eighty-three percent by volume of ethanol;

(6) Motor fuel pump means a meter or similar commercial weighing and measuring device used to measure and dispense motor fuel originating from a motor fuel storage tank;

(7) Retail dealer means a person engaged in the business of storing and dispensing motor fuel from a motor fuel pump for sale on a retail basis;

(8) Retail motor fuel site means a geographic location in this state where a retail dealer sells and dispenses motor fuel from a motor fuel pump on a retail basis; and

(9) Taxpayer means any natural person or any limited liability company, partnership, private domestic or private foreign corporation, or domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation certified pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Laws 2022, LB1261, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB562, § 20.